Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1444
Legislative declarations.

The Legislature declares that:

(1) The public health, safety, and welfare of the residents of this state can be protected by regulating the relationship between dealers and manufacturers, maintaining competition between dealers and manufacturers, and providing consumer protection and fair trade for the purchase and consumer care of recreational vehicles; and

(2) The recreational vehicle industry operates differently than the motor vehicle industry in certain respects and these differences should be reflected in franchise law to serve the needs of consumers, dealers, manufacturers, distributors, and warrantors.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 3.
October 1, 2026